California, session 20252026, AB2056.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 44612 of the Education Code is amended to read:44612. (a) (1) The state board may adopt rules and regulations under which teachers employed by California local educational agencies may exchange positions with teachers in schools in other countries, including Mexico. Mexico and Spain. The arrangements for the exchanges shall be made in cooperation with the teacher exchange programs administered by agencies of the federal government.(2) Any rules and regulations adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall authorize J-1 visa sponsors designated by the United States Department of State to sponsor teachers from other countries, including Mexico and Spain, for placement in California local educational agencies to promote cultural exchange for both of the following purposes:(A) To foster cross-cultural understanding by allowing Mexican teachers from other countries, including Mexico and Spain, to share their knowledge, traditions, and teaching methodologies with pupils and educators in California.(B) To provide participating teachers with firsthand experience in the United States education system, strengthening international collaboration and encouraging mutual appreciation of diverse educational approaches and cultural perspectives.(C) To provide ensure California pupils with access to can engage in bilingual instruction and assist the state’s local educational agencies in meeting their bilingual education needs. supporting diverse language learning opportunities.(b) Grants from the federal government or any department or agency thereof may be accepted by the state, its agencies, and local educational agencies to be expended pursuant to the programs and plans enumerated in this article.(c) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.